Louisiana, session 2026, HB931.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:972.1(E)(4) through (6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§972.1. Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care Initiative
E.
* * *
(4)(a) Program general contractors or subcontractors shall not qualify for a
state grant under the Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care Initiative if the contractors
or subcontractors condition a client's receipt of any services or products on a
requirement that clients attend classes and watch videos that include religious
instruction or require attendance at religious services.
(5)(a) The department shall investigate a contractor or subcontractor alleged
to be in violation of the provisions of this Paragraph.
(b) When the department receives a compliant it shall do all of the following:
(i) Accept and retain evidence of written complaints from the public that
allege a violation of Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-632 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 931
(ii) Respond to each complaint, in writing, to confirm receipt of the
complaint and provide periodic status updates on the department's investigation of
the matter.
(iii) Notify a contractor or subcontractor of a complaint levied against him.
(c) As a result of its investigation, the department may determine that a
violation of Paragraph (4) of this Subsection constitutes grounds for ineligibility,
suspension, termination, or nonrenewal of any contract, grant, or cooperative
endeavor agreement entered into with the department.
(d) The department shall provide written notice to all interested parties of
any action taken against the contractor or subcontractor operating the program
determined to be in violation. The department shall provide written notice within
ninety days of any action take.
(6)(a) Any contractors or subcontractors that fail to comply with the
requirements of Paragraph (4) of this Subsection shall be prohibited from applying
for any state funding for ninety days beginning the day after the last instance of
noncompliance.
(b) Any action taken pursuant to Paragraph (4) of this Subsection shall be in
accordance with applicable state contracting laws, rules, and procedures.
* * *